tests/verbs-test-2.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-optimised-lookup
    Gen: ../unm.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../unm.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch1) iv.aa p1.sg":          
    amals<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : nulamalsi
    tixam<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : ntixamwi
    alam<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : ntalami
    wishas<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : newishasi
    mikentam<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : nemikentam
    pils<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : mpilsi

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch2) iv.aa p1.sg":          
    pals<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : mpalsi
    wikwihel<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : newikwihela
    kes<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : nkesi
    takohch<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : ntakohchi
    talemsk<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : ntalemska #Initial "t" added at top of chart in textbook
    mach<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : nemachi

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch1) iv.aa p2.sg":
    amals<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : kulamasi
    tixam<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : ktixamwi
    alam<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : ktalami
    wishas<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : kewishasi
    mikentam<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : kemikentam
    pils<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : kpilsi

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch2) iv.aa p2.sg":
    pals<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : kpalsi
    wikwihel<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : kwikwihela
    kes<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : kesi
    takohch<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : ktakohchi
    talemsk<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : ktalemska
    takohch<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : kemachi

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch1) iv.aa p3.sg":
    amals<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : welamalsu
    tixam<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : tixamu
    alam<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : alamu
    wishas<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : wishasu
    mikentam<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : mikentam
    pils<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : pilsu

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch2) iv.aa p3.sg":
    pals<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : palsu
    wikwihel<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : wikwihele
    kes<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : kesu
    takohch<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : akohchu      #initial "t" was crossed out in textbook
    talemsk<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : alemske
    takohch<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : machi

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch1) iv.aa p1.excl.pl": #This was marked as incl, excl in text, changed accordingly
    amals<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : nulamalsihena
    tixam<v><iv><aa><p1><exlc><pl> : ntixamwihena    
    alam<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : ntalamhihena 
    wishas<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : newishasihena
    mikentam<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : nemikentamuhena
    pils<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : mpilsihena        

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch2) iv.aa p1.incl.pl": #This was marked as excl, incl in text, changed accordingly
    pals<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : kpalsihena
    wikwihel<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : kwikwihelahena
    kes<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : kesihena
    takohch<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : ktakohchihena
    talemsk<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : ktalemskahena
    takohch<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : kemachihena

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch1) iv.aa p1.incl.pl": 
    amals<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : kulamasihena
    tixam<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : ktixamwihena   
    alam<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : ktalamihena
    wishas<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : kewishasihena
    mikentam<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : kemikentamuhena
    pils<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : kpilsihena       

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch2) iv.aa p1.excl.pl": 
    pals<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : mpalsihena
    wikwihel<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : newikwihelahena
    kes<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : nkesihena
    takohch<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : ntakohchihena
    talemsk<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : ntalemskahena
    takohch<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : nemachihena

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch1) iv.aa p2.pl":
    amals<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : kulamalsihemo
    tixam<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : ktixamwihemo
    alam<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : ktalamihemo 
    wishas<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : kewishasihemo
    mikentam<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : kemikentamuhemo   
    pils<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : kpilsihemo

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch2) iv.aa p2.pl":
    pals<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : kpalsihemo
    wikwihel<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : kwikwihelahemo    
    kes<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : kesihemo
    takohch<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : ktakohchihemo
    talemsk<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : ktalemskahemo
    takohch<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : kemachihemo

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch1) iv.aa p3.pl":
    amals<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : welamalsuwak
    tixam<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : tixamuwak
    alam<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : alamuwak
    wishas<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : wishasuwak
    mikentam<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : mikentamuwak
    pils<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : kpilsihemo             

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch2) iv.aa p3.pl":
    pals<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : palsuwak
    wikwihel<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : wikwiheleyok
    kes<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : kesuwak              
    takohch<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : akohchuwak     #initial "t" crossed out in textbook
    talemsk<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : alemskeyok
    takohch<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : machiyok

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch3) iv.aa p1.sg":
    asu<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : ntasuwi
    puhenema<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : mpuhenema
    kentk<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : nkentka
    lashim<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : ntelashimwi

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch4) iv.aa p1.sg":
    katup<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : nkatupwi
    ite<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : ntite
    mits<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : nemitsi
    mene<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : nemene

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch3) iv.aa p2.sg":
    asu<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : ktasuwi
    puhenema<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : kepuhenema
    kentk<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : kentka
    lashim<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : kelashimwi

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch4) iv.aa p2.sg":
    katup<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : katupwi
    ite<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : ktite
    mits<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : kemitsi
    mene<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : kemene

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch3) iv.aa p3.sg":
    asu<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : asuu
    puhenema<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : puhenema
    kentk<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : kentke
    lashim<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : lashimu

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch4) iv.aa p3.sg":
    katup<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : katupu
    ite<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : litehe
    mits<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : mitsu
    mene<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : mene

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch3) iv.aa p1.excl.pl":
    asu<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : ntasuwihena
    puhenema<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : mpuhenemahena
    kentk<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : nkentkahena
    lashim<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : ntelashimwihena

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch4) iv.aa p1.incl.pl":
    katup<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> :   n/a    #chapter 4 not in scan
    ite<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : n/a
    mits<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : n/a
    mene<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : n/a

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch3) iv.aa p1.incl.pl":
    asu<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : ktasuwihena
    puhenema<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : kepuhenemahena
    kentk<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : kentkahena
    lashim<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : kelashimwihena

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch4) iv.aa p1.excl.pl":
    katup<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : n/a
    ite<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : n/a
    mits<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : n/a
    mene<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : n/a

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch3) iv.aa p2.pl":
    asu<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : ktasuwihemo
    puhenema<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : kepuhenemahemo
    kentk<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : kentkahemo
    lashim<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : kelashimwihemo
  
  "[lexc/twol] (Ch4) iv.aa p2.pl":
    katup<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : n/a
    ite<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : n/a
    mits<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : n/a
    mene<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : n/a

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch3) iv.aa p3.pl":
    asu<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : asuwak
    puhenema<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : puhenemaok
    kentk<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : kentkeyok
    lashim<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : lashimuwak

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch4) iv.aa p3.pl":
    katup<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : n/a
    ite<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : n/a
    mits<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : n/a
    mene<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : n/a

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch5) iv.aa p1.sg":          
    ahp<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : ntapi
    kata<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : nkata  
    shinki<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : nshinki

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch6) iv.aa p1.sg":          
    ashewil<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : ntashewil
    pap<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : mpapi

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch5) iv.aa p2.sg":
    ahp<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : ktapi
    kata<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : kata
    shinki<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : kshinki

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch6) iv.aa p2.sg":
    ashewil<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : ktashewil
    pap<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : kpapi

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch5) iv.aa p3.sg":
    ahp<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : ahpu
    kata<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : kota    #also possible to surface as kahta
    shinki<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : shinki

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch6) iv.aa p3.sg":
    ashewil<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : ashewil
    pap<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : papu    

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch5) iv.aa p1.excl.pl": 
    ahp<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : ntapihena
    kata<v><iv><aa><p1><exlc><pl> : nkatatamuhena
    #shinki<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> :     no listed form in the text?

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch6) iv.aa p1.incl.pl": 
    ashewil<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : ktashewilhena
    pap<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : kpapihena

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch5) iv.aa p1.incl.pl": 
    ahp<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : ktapihena
    kata<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : katatamuhena
    #shinki<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> :     no listed form in the text?

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch6) iv.aa p2.pl":
    ashewil<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : ktashewilhemo
    pap<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : kpapihemo

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch5) iv.aa p2.pl":
    ahp<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : ktapihemo
    kata<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : katatamuhemo
  
  "[lexc/twol] (Ch6) iv.aa p3.pl":
    ashewil<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : ashewileyok
    pap<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : papuwak

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch5) iv.aa p3.pl":
    ahp<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : ahpuwak
    kata<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : kotatamuk #also possible to surface as kahtatamuk

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch7) iv.aa p1.sg":          
    këlëks<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : nkëlëksi #possible umlaut above both e's in the text?
    melimu<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : nemelimu  
    hakihe<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : ntakihe
    talakihel<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : ntalakihela  #"t" inserted in parentheses as initial
    winewe<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : newinewe
    
  "[lexc/twol] (Ch7) iv.aa p2.sg":
    këlëks<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : këlëksi 
    melimu<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : kemelimu  
    hakihe<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : ktakihe
    talakihel<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : ktalakihela 
    winewe<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : kewinewe
    
  "[lexc/twol] (Ch7) iv.aa p3.sg":
    këlëks<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : këlëksu #"ë" noted above the stem in text
    melimu<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : melimu  
    hakihe<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : hakihe
    talakihel<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : alakihele
    winewe<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : winewe
     
  "[lexc/twol] (Ch7) iv.aa p1.excl.pl": 
    këlëks<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : nkëlëksihena
    melimu<v><iv><aa><p1><exlc><pl> : nemilimuhena
    hakihe<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : ntakihehena
    talakihel<v><iv><aa><p1><exlc><pl> : ntalakihelahena
    winewe<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : newinewehena

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch7) iv.aa p1.incl.pl": 
    këlëks<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : këlëksihena
    melimu<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : kemilimuhena
    hakihe<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : ktakihehena
    talakihel<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : ktalakihelahena
    winewe<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : kewinewehena

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch7) iv.aa p2.pl":
    këlëks<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : këlëksihemo
    melimu<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : kemilimuhemo
    hakihe<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : ktakihehemo
    talakihel<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : ktalakihelahemo
    winewe<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : kewinewehemo

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch7) iv.aa p3.pl":
    këlëks<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : këlëksuwak
    melimu<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : melimuwak
    hakihe<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : hakiheyok
    talakihel<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : alakiheleyok
    winewe<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : wineweyok
